West Virginia, session 2025, SB926.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-2-46. Optional course in firefighter one classes. (a) The Department of Education shall establish an optional course for students in grades nine through 12 as a part of their curriculum.(b) The 120-hour Firefighter One class shall include NFPA 1001 2019 FF 1 Standard, HazMat Awareness/Operations, and First Aid/CPR certification for students.  (c) Successful completion of this class shall provide the minimum requirements by the West Virginia State Fire Commission to respond to fire calls.